California, session 20252026, AB687.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1367.668 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1367.668. (a) Every health care service plan contract, except a specialized health care service plan contract, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, shall provide coverage without cost sharing for a colorectal cancer screening test assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force. The that meets any of the following conditions:(1) Approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and meets the requirements for coverage established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services National Coverage Determination 210.3.(2) Approved by the FDA and included in the most recently published guidelines from the American Cancer Society.(3) Assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force.(b) The required colonoscopy for a positive result on a test or procedure, other than a colonoscopy, that is a colorectal cancer screening examination or laboratory test identified assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force that meets any of the conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall also be provided without cost sharing.(b)(c) This section does not preclude a health care service plan that has coverage for out-of-network benefits from imposing cost-sharing requirements for the items or services described in this section that are delivered by an out-of-network provider.SEC. 2. Section 10123.207 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10123.207. (a) Every health insurance policy, except a specialized health insurance policy, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, shall provide coverage without cost sharing for a colorectal cancer screening test assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force. The that meets any of the following conditions:(1) Approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and meets the requirements for coverage established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services National Coverage Determination 210.3.(2) Approved by the FDA and included in the most recently published guidelines from the American Cancer Society.(3) Assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force.(b) The required colonoscopy for a positive result on a test or procedure, other than a colonoscopy, that is a colorectal cancer screening examination or laboratory test identified assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force that meets any of the conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall also be provided without cost sharing.(b)(c) This section does not preclude a health insurer that has a network of providers from imposing cost-sharing requirements for the items or services described in this section that are delivered by an out-of-network provider.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 4581.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4581.5.(a)Notwithstanding Section 4527, up to 35 projects per year, that are each exclusively for noncommercial wildfire fuels reduction in timberland, are less than 1,500 acres in size, and are paid for in part or in whole with public funds, may prepare a timber harvesting plan pursuant to this article to comply with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).(b)This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.